Washington statutes.
RCW 35.106.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Crime-free rental housing program" means a crime prevention program designed to reduce crime, drugs, and gangs on rental housing premises under the supervision of the local police department or a crime prevention officer. The program may include, but is not limited to: Property management and crime prevention training classes; crime prevention through environmental design surveys; and community awareness training.

(2) "Criminal activity" means a criminal act defined by statute or ordinance that threatens the health, safety, or welfare of the tenants, owner, guests, occupants, or property manager.

(3) "Local government" means any city, code city, town, or county.

(4) "Premises" has the same meaning as in RCW 59.18.030.

(5) "Rental housing" means any tenancy subject to chapter 59.12, 59.18, or 59.20 RCW.

[ 2010 c 132 s 2.]